en: Watercraft motor mount adjustment features: Fixed (no adjustment); Folding; Height adjustable (manual); Height adjustable (powered); Quick-release; Slide/track adjustable; Swivel; Tilt; Other
it: Caratteristiche di regolazione del supporto motore del natante: Fissa (nessuna regolazione); Pieghevole; Regolabile in altezza (manuale); Regolabile in altezza (a motore); Sgancio rapido; Regolabile a scorrimento/binario; Girevole; Inclinabile; Altro
da: Justeringsfunktioner for motorbeslag til fartøj: Fast (ingen justering); Sammenklappelig; Højdejusterbar (manuel); Højdejusterbar (motoriseret); Hurtigudløser; Skinne/sporjusterbar; Drejelig; Vipbar; Andet
lt-LT: Vandens transporto priemonės variklio tvirtinimo reguliavimo ypatybės: Fiksuotas (nereguliuojamas); Sulankstomas; Reguliuojamas aukštis (rankinis); Reguliuojamas aukštis (elektrinis); Greito atleidimo; Reguliuojamas slankikliu / bėgeliu; Sukiojamas; Pakreipiamas; Kita
fi: Vesikulkuneuvon moottorin kiinnityksen säätöominaisuudet: Kiinteä (ei säätöä); Taittuva; Korkeussäädettävä (manuaalinen); Korkeussäädettävä (sähkökäyttöinen); Pikakiinnitys; Säädettävä liuku/kisko; Kääntyvä; Kallistus; Muu
sk-SK: Funkcie nastavenia držiaka motora plavidla: Pevné (bez nastavenia); Sklápacie; Nastaviteľná výška (ručne); Nastaviteľná výška (elektricky); Rýchloupínacie; Posuvné/nastaviteľné v drážke; Otočné; Náklopné; Iné
pt-BR: Suporte de motor de embarcação recursos de ajuste: Fixo (sem ajuste); Dobrável; Altura ajustável (manual); Altura ajustável (motorizado); Liberação rápida; Ajustável por deslizamento/trilho; Giratório; Inclinável; Outros
nl: Watervaartuig motorsteun afstelfuncties: Vast (geen aanpassing); Inklapbaar; In hoogte verstelbaar (handmatig); In hoogte verstelbaar (elektrisch); Snelkoppeling; Schuif-/railverstelbaar; Draaibaar; Kantelbaar; Overige
nb: Funksjoner for justering av båtens motorfeste: Fast (ingen justering); Nedfellbar; Høydejusterbar (manuell); Høydejusterbar (motorisert); Hurtigutløser; Justerbart glide-/sporsystem; Svingbar; Vippbar; Annet
ja: 水上バイク用モーターマウント調整機能: 固定式 (調整不可); 折りたたみ式; 高さ調整可能 (手動); 高さ調整可能 (電動); クイックリリース; スライド/トラック調整式; スイベル; チルト; その他
bg-BG: Функции за регулиране на стойката за мотор на плавателен съд: Фиксирана (без регулиране); Сгъваема; С регулиране на височината (ръчно); С регулиране на височината (моторизирано); Бързо освобождаване; С регулиране чрез плъзгач/релса; Въртяща се; С накланяне; Други
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ρύθμισης βάσης κινητήρα σκάφους: Σταθερό (χωρίς ρύθμιση); Αναδιπλούμενο; Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος (χειροκίνητα); Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος (ηλεκτρικά); Ταχεία αποδέσμευση; Ρυθμιζόμενο με ολίσθηση/ράγα; Περιστρεφόμενο; Με κλίση; Άλλο
sv: Justeringsfunktioner för vattenskoterns motorfäste: Fast (ingen justering); Fällbar; Höjdjusterbar (manuell); Höjdjusterbar (motordriven); Snabbfäste; Skjut-/spårjusterbar; Snurrbar; Lutningsbar; Övrigt
es: Características de montaje del soporte del motor de la embarcación: Fijo (sin ajuste); Plegable; Altura ajustable (manual); Altura ajustable (motorizada); Liberación rápida; Ajustable por deslizamiento/pista; Giratorio; Inclinación; Otro
cs: Možnosti nastavení držáku motoru: Pevný (bez možnosti nastavení); Sklápěcí; Výškově nastavitelný (ručně); Výškově nastavitelný (elektricky); Rychloupínací; Nastavitelný posunem / v drážce; Otočný; Naklápěcí; Jiné
vi: Các tính năng điều chỉnh giá đỡ động cơ tàu thuyền: Cố định (không điều chỉnh được); Có thể gập; Điều chỉnh độ cao (thủ công); Điều chỉnh độ cao (bằng điện); Tháo lắp nhanh; Điều chỉnh trượt/theo rãnh; Xoay; Nghiêng; Khác
pl: Funkcje regulacji mocowania silnika jednostki pływającej: Stały (bez regulacji); Składany; Regulacja wysokości (ręczna); Regulacja wysokości (elektryczna); Szybkozłączka; Regulacja przesuwna/prowadnicowa; Obrotowy; Uchylny; Inne
ko: 선박용 모터 마운트 조정 기능: 고정식(조절 불가); 접이식; 높이 조절식(수동); 높이 조절식(전동); 퀵 릴리스; 슬라이드/트랙 조절식; 스위블형; 틸트형; 기타
zh-TW: 船艇馬達座調整功能: 固定式 (不可調); 摺疊式; 可調高度 (手動); 可調高度 (電動); 快拆式; 滑軌/軌道可調式; 旋轉式; 傾斜式; 其他
th: คุณสมบัติการปรับฐานยึดมอเตอร์เรือ: ตายตัว (ปรับไม่ได้); พับได้; ปรับความสูงได้ (แบบใช้มือ); ปรับความสูงได้ (แบบใช้ไฟฟ้า); ปลดเร็ว; ปรับตามราง/การเลื่อน; หมุนได้; เอียงได้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Funcionalidades de ajuste do suporte do motor da embarcação: Fixo (sem ajuste); Dobrável; Ajustável em altura (manual); Ajustável em altura (motorizado); Libertação rápida; Deslizante/via ajustável; Giratório; Inclinável; Outro
ru: Функции регулировки крепления мотора водного транспорта: Фиксированное (без регулировки); Складное; Регулировка высоты (ручная); Регулировка высоты (с электроприводом); Быстросъемное; Регулировка по направляющим; Поворотное; Наклонное; Другое
ro-RO: Caracteristici de ajustare a suportului motorului pentru ambarcațiuni: Fix (fără reglaj); Pliabil; Reglabil pe înălțime (manual); Reglabil pe înălțime (electric); Eliberare rapidă; Reglabil pe șină/glisieră; Pivotant; Înclinabil; Altele
tr: Deniz aracı motor montaj ayar özellikleri: Sabit (ayarsız); Katlanabilir; Yüksekliği ayarlanabilir (manuel); Yüksekliği ayarlanabilir (motorlu); Hızlı açılan; Kızak/ray ayarlı; Döner; Eğimli; Diğer
sl-SI: Lastnosti nastavljanja nosilca motorja plovila: Fiksno (brez prilagoditve); Zložljivo; Nastavljiva višina (ročno); Nastavljiva višina (električno); Hitra sprostitev; Prilagodljivo drsno/po tirnici; Vrtljivo; Nagibno; Drugo
hu: Vízi jármű motortartójának beállítási funkciói: Rögzített (nem állítható); Összecsukható; Állítható magasságú (kézi); Állítható magasságú (motoros); Gyorskioldós; Csúszkával/sínnel állítható; Forgó; Dönthető; Egyéb
hr-HR: Značajke podešavanja nosača motora plovila: Fiksno (bez prilagodbe); Sklopivo; Podesive visine (ručno); Podesive visine (električno); Brzo otpuštanje; Podesivo klizno / po tračnici; Zakretno; Nagibno; Ostalo
fr: Caractéristiques de réglage du support de moteur d’embarcation: Fixe (sans réglage); Pliable; Réglable en hauteur (manuel); Réglable en hauteur (motorisé); Fixation rapide; Réglable par glissière/rail; Pivotant; Inclinable; Autre
zh-CN: 船舶发动机支架调节功能: 固定（不可调节）; 折叠式; 高度可调（手动）; 高度可调（电动）; 快拆式; 滑动/轨道可调; 旋转式; 倾斜式; 其他
de: Einstellmöglichkeiten der Motorhalterung des Wasserfahrzeugs: Fest (nicht verstellbar); Klappbar; Höhenverstellbar (manuell); Höhenverstellbar (elektrisch); Schnellspanner; Schlitten/Schiene verstellbar; Schwenkbar; Kippbar; Sonstige